dictsource/th_rules
.group		ื
	L01)ือ	ɯː
	L01)ื(L01	ɯː
	เ)ือ	ɯa	//เ◌ือ
	เ)ือ(L01	ɯa	//เ◌ือ◌
.group		ใ // ok
	ใ(L01	aj
	ใน	naj
	ใบ	baj
	ใบ้	baj˥˩
	ใผ่	faj˨˩
	ใภ้	phaj˥˩
	ใย	jaj
	ใส	saj
	ใส่	saj˨˩
	ให้	haj˥˩
	ใหล	laj
	ใหญ่	jaj˨˩
	ใหม่	maj˨˩
	โกง	ko:ŋ
	โกฏิ	ko:t˨˩
	โกน	ko:n
	โกย	ko:j
	โกรธ	kro:t˨˩
	โกร่ง	kro:ŋ˨˩
	โกลน	klo:n
	โกศ	ko:t˨˩
	โก่ง	ko:ŋ˨˩
	โข	kho:˩˦
	โขก	kho:k˨˩
	โขง	kho:ŋ˩˦
	โขด	kho:t˨˩
	โขน	kho:n˩˦
	โขลง	khlo:ŋ˩˦
	โค	kho:
	โคก	kho:k˥˩
	โคตร	kho:t˥˩
	โคน	kho:n
	โคม	kho:m
	โครง	khro:ŋ
	โครต	kho:t˥˩
	โคร่ง	khro:ŋ˥˩
	โคลน	khlo:n
	โค่น	kho:n˥˩
	โค้ก	kho:k˦˥
	โค้ง	kho:ŋ˦˥
	โค้ช	kho:t˦˥
	โค้ด	kho:t˦˥
	โค้ท	kho:t˦˥
	โค๊ก	kho:k˦˥
	โง่	ŋo:˥˩
	โจทก์	cho:t˨˩
	โจทย์	cho:t˨˩
	โจน	cho:n
	โจร	cho:n
	โจ้	cho:˥˩
	โจ๊ก	cho:k˦˥
	โจ๋	cho:˩˦
	โฉด	cho:t˨˩
	โฉม	cho:m˩˦
	โชค	cho:k˥˩
	โชย	cho:j
	โชว์	cho:
	โช้ค	cho:k˦˥
	โซน	so:n
	โซล	so:l
	โซ่	so:˥˩
	โด	do:
	โดด	do:t˨˩
	โดน	do:n
	โดย	do:j
	โด่	do:˨˩
	โด่ง	do:ŋ˨˩
	โต	to:
	โต้	to:˥˩
	โต๊ะ	toʔ˦˥
	โถ	tho:˩˦
	โถง	tho:ŋ˩˦
	โท	tho:
	โทน	tho:n
	โทร	tho:
	โทรม	so:m
	โทรลล์	thro:l
	โทร่ห	thro:˥˩
	โทษ	tho:t˥˩
	โทส	tho:t˥˩
	โท่รห	thro:˥˩
	โน	no:
	โน่น	no:n˥˩
	โน้น	no:n˦˥
	โน้ม	no:m˦˥
	โบ	bo:
	โบก	bo:k˨˩
	โบย	bo:j
	โบสถ์	bo:t˨˩
	โบ้	bo:˥˩
	โบ๋	bo:˩˦
	โปรด	pro:t˨˩
	โปรย	pro:j
	โปร่ง	pro:ŋ˨˩
	โป่ง	po:ŋ˨˩
	โป้ง	po:ŋ˥˩
	โป๊	po:˦˥
	โป๊ป	po:p˦˥
	โผ	pho:˩˦
	โผน	pho:n˩˦
	โผล่	phlo:˨˩
	โพ	pho:
	โพก	pho:k˥˩
	โพย	pho:j
	โพรง	phro:ŋ
	โพ้น	pho:n˦˥
	โฟม	fo:m
	โมง	mo:ŋ
	โมะ	moʔ˦˥
	โม่	mo:˥˩
	โม่ง	mo:ŋ˥˩
	โม้	mo:˦˥
	โยก	jo:k˥˩
	โยง	jo:ŋ
	โยน	jo:n
	โยบ	jo:p˦˥
	โยม	jo:m
	โย่ง	jo:ŋ˥˩
	โรค	ro:k˥˩
	โรง	ro:ŋ
	โรจน์	ro:t˥˩
	โรม	ro:m
	โรย	ro:j
	โลก	lo:k˥˩
	โลง	lo:ŋ
	โลด	lo:t˥˩
	โลน	lo:n
	โลภ	lo:p˥˩
	โละ	loʔ˦˥
	โล่	lo:˥˩
	โล่ง	lo:ŋ˥˩
	โล่ห์	lo:˥˩
	โล้	lo:˦˥
	โล้น	lo:n˦˥
	โว	wo:
	โวลต์	wo:n˦˥
	โศก	so:k˨˩
	โสฒิ	so:t˨˩
	โสณ	so:n˩˦
	โสด	so:t˨˩
	โสม	so:m˩˦
	โสษ	so:t˨˩
	โหด	ho:t˨˩
	โหน	ho:n˩˦
	โหนก	no:k˨˩
	โหม	ho:m˩˦
	โหร	ho:n˩˦
	โหล	lo:˩˦
	โหลด	lo:t˨˩
	โหล่	lo:˨˩
	โหวด	wo:t˨˩
	โหวต	wo:t˨˩
	โหว่	wo:˨˩
	โอ	ʔo:
	โอฐ	ʔo:t˨˩
	โอน	ʔo:n
	โอบ	ʔo:p˨˩
	โอษฐ์	ʔo:t˨˩
	โอห์ม	ʔo:m
	โอ่ง	ʔo:ŋ˨˩
	โอ๊ก	ʔo:k˦˥
	โอ๊ต	ʔo:t˦˥
	ใกล้	klaj˥˩
	ใข่	khaj˨˩
	ใคร	khraj
	ใคร่	khraj˥˩
	ใจ	chaj
	ใชย	chaj
	ใช่	chaj˥˩
	ใช้	chaj˦˥
	ใด	daj
	ใต้	ta:j˥˩
	ใน	naj
	ใบ	baj
	ใบ้	baj˥˩
	ใฝ	faj˩˦
	ใฝ่	faj˨˩
	ใภ้	phaj˦˥
	ใย	jaj
	ใส	saj˩˦
	ใส่	saj˨˩
	ใส้	saj˥˩
	ใหญ่	jaj˨˩
	ใหม่	maj˨˩
	ให้	haj˥˩

.group		ไ // ok
	_)ไ ai
	L01)ไ ai
	ไท    thaj
	ไทย	thaj
	ไป	paj
	ไฟ	faj
	ไผ่	phaj
	ไกล	klaj
	ไข	khaj
	ไม้	ma:j˦˥
	ไก	kaj
	ไกด์	kaj˦˥
	ไกว	kwaj
	ไก่	kaj˨˩
	ไข	khaj˩˦
	ไขว่	khwaj˨˩
	ไขว้	khwaj˥˩
	ไข่	khaj˨˩
	ไข้	khaj˥˩
	ไค	khaj
	ไคล	khlaj
	ไง	ŋaj
	ไจ	chaj
	ไช	chaj
	ไชย	chaj
	ไซ	saj
	ไซน์	sa:j
	ไซร้	saj˦˥
	ไซ้	saj˦˥
	ไดรฟ์	draj˦˥
	ไดร์	daj
	ได้	da:j˥˩
	ไต	taj
	ไตร	traj
	ไต่	taj˨˩
	ไต้	ta:j˥˩
	ไถ	thaj˩˦
	ไถ่	thaj˨˩
	ไท	thaj
	ไทย	thaj
	ไทร	saj
	ไท้	thaj˦˥
	ไน	naj
	ไบต์	baj˦˥
	ไป	paj
	ไป่	paj˨˩
	ไผ่	phaj˨˩
	ไฝ	faj˩˦
	ไฝ่	faj˨˩
	ไพร	phraj
	ไพร่	phraj˥˩
	ไพล	phlaj
	ไพ่	phaj˥˩
	ไฟ	faj
	ไฟล์	fa:j
	ไม	maj
	ไมล์	maj
	ไม่	maj˥˩
	ไม้	ma:j˦˥
	ไย	jaj
	ไย่	jaj˥˩
	ไร	raj
	ไร่	raj˥˩
	ไร้	raj˦˥
	ไล่	laj˥˩
	ไล้	laj˦˥
	ไว	waj
	ไวน์	wa:j
	ไว้	waj˦˥
	ไส	saj˩˦
	ไส้	saj˥˩
	ไห	haj˩˦
	ไหน	naj˩˦
	ไหม	maj˩˦
	ไหม้	maj˥˩
	ไหล	laj˩˦
	ไหล่	laj˨˩
	ไหว	waj˩˦
	ไหว้	wa:j˥˩
	ไห้	haj˥˩
	ไอ	ʔaj
	ไอ้	ʔaj˥˩
	ไฮ้	haj˦˥


//.group		่
//	่	˨˩

//.group		้
//	้	˥˩

//.group		๊
//	๊	˦˥

//.group		๋
//	๋	˩˦
